Nebraska, session 109, LB480.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB480 LB480
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 37-1802, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-1802 The Legislature finds and declares as follows:
(1) The future vibrancy of the people, communities, and businesses
of Nebraska depends on reliable sources of water;
(2) While it is in the state's best interest to retain control over
its water supplies, much of the state's water resources are currently
underutilized;
(3) In 2019, the state experienced historic flooding along the
Platte River which caused loss of life and over one billion dollars in
damage to private and public property and infrastructure;
(4) Well-planned flood control is critical to the future of the
people, communities, and businesses of Nebraska;
(5) In light of the disruption from the COVID-19 pandemic and the
trend toward a remote workforce around the country, people around the
country are rethinking where they want to work, live, and raise a family.
As people consider where to live, access to sustainable water resources
and outdoor recreational opportunities will be important considerations
in making Nebraska a competitive choice for the future;
(6) The state's lakes and rivers help Nebraskans enjoy the water
resources in our state and make Nebraska an even more attractive place to
live and raise a family;
(7) The state's water resources provide economic benefits to the
people, communities, and businesses of Nebraska by helping to attract
visitors from other states and boosting local economies;
(8) In 2021, the Legislature passed LB406, which established the
Statewide Tourism And Recreational Water Access and Resource
Sustainability Special Committee of the Legislature. The committee was
tasked with conducting studies on:
(a) The need to protect public and private property, including use
of levee systems, enhance economic development, and promote private
-2-

LB480 LB480
2025 2025
investment and the creation of jobs along the Platte River and its
tributaries from Columbus, Nebraska, to Plattsmouth, Nebraska;
(b) The need to provide for public safety, public infrastructure,
land-use planning, recreation, and economic development in the Lake
McConaughy region of Keith County, Nebraska; and
(c) The socioeconomic conditions, recreational and tourism
opportunities, and public investment necessary to enhance economic
development and to catalyze private investment in the region in Knox
County, Nebraska, that lies north of State Highway 12 and extends to the
South Dakota border and includes Lewis and Clark Lake and Niobrara State
Park;
(9) After considerable study, the Statewide Tourism And Recreational
Water Access and Resource Sustainability Special Committee identified the
following potential opportunities:
(a) Marina construction projects or other projects identified to
expand water access or and recreational opportunities at Lake McConaughy
and the Lewis and Clark State Recreation Area; and
(b) Projects A project to increase access to and the enjoyment of
Niobrara State Park through the construction of an event center and lodge
or through other projects identified to increase recreational opportunity
and the enjoyment of Niobrara State Park;
(10) It is in the public interest to expand water access and
recreational opportunities at Lake McConaughy and the Lewis and Clark
State Recreation Area through the construction of new marinas or through
infrastructure projects identified to improve access to the areas for
recreational opportunities and water access; and
(11) It is in the public interest to increase access to and the
enjoyment of Niobrara State Park through the construction of an event
center and lodge or through projects identified to increase recreational
opportunity and the enjoyment of Niobrara State Park.
Sec. 2. Section 37-1803, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-3-

LB480 LB480
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
37-1803 (1) The purposes of the Water Recreation Enhancement Act are
to administer and carry out the following projects:
(a) Marina construction projects or other projects identified to
improve expand water access or and recreational opportunities at Lake
McConaughy and the Lewis and Clark State Recreation Area; and
(b) Projects A project to increase access to and the enjoyment of
Niobrara State Park through the construction of an event center and lodge
or through other projects identified to increase recreational opportunity
and enjoyment of Niobrara State Park.
(2) The Game and Parks Commission is granted all power necessary to
carry out the purposes of the Water Recreation Enhancement Act,
including, but not limited to, the power to:
(a) Enter into contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts
relating to the provision of construction services, management services,
legal services, auditor services, and other consulting services or advice
as the commission may require in the performance of its duties; and
(b) Enter into public-private partnerships to carry out the purposes
of the act.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Game and Parks
Commission engage local stakeholders as the commission carries out the
projects authorized in this section.
(4) It is also the intent of the Legislature to encourage political
subdivisions that hold a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission license and
that own land in and around the projects authorized in this section to
enter into contracts with public and private entities for the use, lease,
and purchase of such land whenever possible in order to increase economic
development and recreational opportunities, particularly when covenants,
easements, and other instruments can ensure such economic development
complies with the rules and regulations of the Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission.
-4-

LB480 LB480
2025 2025
(5) No member of the Game and Parks Commission or any employee of
the commission shall have a financial interest, either personally or
through an immediate family member, in any purchase, sale, or lease of
real property relating to a project authorized in this section or in any
contract entered into by the commission relating to a project authorized
in this section. For purposes of this subsection, immediate family member
means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or grandchild.
Sec. 3. Original sections 37-1802 and 37-1803, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-